Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.08, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Notice to workers. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall consult with the commissioner of labor and industry to create and distribute an educational poster providing notice of employee rights provided under this chapter. The notice shall be available in English and the five most common languages spoken in Minnesota. This material must include rights of an individual to file a charge with the commissioner or to bring a civil action authorized under section 363A.33, subdivision 1. Each employer must post and keep posted the notice of an individual's rights created pursuant to this subdivision in a place where employee notices are customarily located within the workplace. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027. new text end